Colorado, session 2026A, SB179.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-101, amend
(3)(d) and (3)(e); and add (3)(f) as follows:
8-14.4-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 14.4, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) "Principal" means:
(d) An entity that contracts with five or more independent
contractors in the state each year; and
(e) A person or entity engaged in agricultural employment; AND
(f) A "PUBLIC EMPLOYER", AS DEFINED IN SECTION 29-33-103
(6)(f) AND (6)(g).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-14.4-107, add (5)
as follows:
8-14.4-107. Whistleblower enforcement - qui tam - definition.
(5) ANY ACTION OR POTENTIAL ACTION ARISING UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 14.4 IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS, NOTICE
REQUIREMENTS, PROCEDURAL REQUIREMENTS, OR LIABILITY RESTRICTIONS
SET FORTH IN THE "COLORADO GOVERNMENTAL IMMUNITY ACT", ARTICLE
10 OF TITLE 24.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
-2- SB26-179

referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-3- SB26-179